Utah statutes.
17D-3-203.   Considerations in determining whether to approve conservation
district creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution -- Denial or
approval -- Notice and plat to lieutenant governor -- Recording requirements
-- Prohibition against considering similar creation, consolidation, division,
or dissolution if previously denied.
(1)  In determining whether to approve the creation of a conservation
district, the consolidation of existing conservation districts, or the
division or dissolution of an existing conservation district, the commission
shall consider:
(a)  the demonstrated necessity and administrative practicality of the
creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution;
(b)  the topography of and soil compositions and prevailing land use practices
within the area of the proposed or existing conservation district or
districts;
(c)  the hydrologic unit code of the watershed in which the area of the
proposed or existing conservation district or districts is located;
(d)  the relationship of the area of the proposed or existing conservation
district or districts to existing watersheds and agricultural regions; and
(e)  the sentiment expressed by persons within the area of the proposed or
existing conservation district or districts with respect to the proposed
creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution.
(2)  After holding a public hearing as required under Subsection
17D-3-201(2)(b) and considering the factors listed in Subsection (1), the
commission shall:
(a) (i)  disapprove the creation of a conservation district, the consolidation
of existing conservation districts, or the division or dissolution of an
existing conservation district, as the case may be, if the commission
determines that creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution is not
necessary or administratively practical; or
(ii)  approve the creation of a conservation district, the consolidation of
existing conservation districts, or the division or dissolution of an existing
conservation district, as the case may be, if the commission determines that
creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution is necessary and
administratively practical; and
(b)  set forth in writing the reasons for the commission's action.
(3) (a)  If the commission approves the creation, consolidation, division, or
dissolution, the commission shall:
(i)  deliver to the lieutenant governor:
(A)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(B)  except in the case of a dissolution, a copy of an approved final local
entity plat, as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5; and
(ii)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of boundary
action under Section 67-1a-6.5:
(A)  if the conservation district is or, in the case of dissolution, was
located within the boundary of a single county, submit to the recorder of that
county:
(I)  the original:
(Aa)  notice of an impending boundary action;
(Bb)  certificate of boundary action; and
(Cc)  except in the case of dissolution, approved final local entity plat; and
(II)  a certified copy of the document that the commission adopted approving
the boundary action; or
(B)  if the conservation district is or, in the case of a dissolution, was
located within the boundaries of more than a single county:
(I)  submit to the recorder of one of those counties:
(Aa)  the original of the documents listed in Subsections
(3)(a)(ii)(A)(I)(Aa), (Bb), and (Cc); and
(Bb)  a certified copy of the document that the commission adopted approving
the boundary action; and
(II)  submit to the recorder of each other county:
(Aa)  a certified copy of the documents listed in Subsections
(3)(a)(ii)(A)(I)(Aa), (Bb), and (Cc); and
(Bb)  a certified copy of the document that the commission adopted approving
the boundary action.
(b)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate of creation,
consolidation, division, or dissolution under Section 67-1a-6.5, as the case
may be, the conservation district is created and incorporated, consolidated,
divided, or dissolved, respectively.
(4)  If the commission disapproves a creation, consolidation, division, or
dissolution under Subsection (2)(a)(i), the commission may not, for six months
following the denial, consider a similar proposal to create, divide, or
dissolve the conservation district or to consolidate the conservation
districts, as the case may be.
